Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-120
Cuming.

The county of Cuming is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township twenty-one, north, of range four, east; thence east to the southeast corner of township twenty-one, north, of range seven, east; thence north to the northeast corner of township twenty-four, north, of range seven, east; thence west to the northwest corner of township twenty-four, north, of range four, east; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 13, p. 214;

R.S.1913, § 833;

C.S.1922, § 735;

C.S.1929, § 25-122;

R.S.1943, § 22-120.